Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4144.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [626.745] USE OF CHEMICAL IRRITANTS; DISCLOSURE REQUIRED. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Definition. new text end new text begin For purposes of this section, "building" has the meaning given in section 609.581, subdivision 2. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Notice of use; identification of products deployed. new text end new text begin (a) Notwithstanding any data classification under chapter 13, a peace officer, law enforcement agency, and local unit of government must provide information about the use of any chemical irritant, smoke screen, or diversionary device deployed within a building as required under this section. new text end new text begin (b) A peace officer from a law enforcement agency that deploys a chemical irritant within a building, or an officer from the lead law enforcement agency if officers from multiple agencies deploy chemical irritants, must provide notice of the deployment to the owner of the building and, if the building is a private residence, the occupant of the residence. If the building contains two or more dwelling units, a peace officer must notify the occupant of any unit in which a chemical irritant was deployed. A peace officer may notify the occupant of any other unit. A peace officer may provide notice by giving a building owner or occupant the standard form created by the commissioner of public safety, leaving the form in a place where it is likely to be seen by a building owner or occupant, or providing the information contained in the form orally or in another format. new text end new text begin (c) Upon request, the law enforcement agency or local government unit that employs a peace officer who deployed a chemical irritant, smoke screen, or diversionary device within a building must disclose information about the products deployed to: new text end new text begin (1) the building owner; new text end new text begin (2) any tenant in the building; new text end new text begin (3) any applicable insurer; and new text end new text begin (4) any person retained to provide cleaning or other remediation services related to the deployment of chemical irritants, smoke screens, or diversionary devices. new text end new text begin (d) Information about any products deployed within a building must include the name, product number, and total number of all chemical irritants, smoke screens, and diversionary devices deployed by a peace officer employed by the law enforcement agency or local government unit. new text end new text begin (e) If officers from multiple law enforcement agencies deployed chemical irritants, smoke screens, or diversionary devices, the lead law enforcement agency must identify the other law enforcement agencies involved when responding to a request described in paragraph (c). new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Standard form. new text end new text begin (a) The commissioner of public safety must create a standard notification form for use by peace officers and law enforcement agencies. At a minimum, the form must state that: new text end new text begin (1) a chemical irritant was deployed within the building; new text end new text begin (2) specialized cleanup or treatment of the building may be appropriate; and new text end new text begin (3) the building owner or occupant may contact the law enforcement agency or local government unit that employs the peace officer for more information about what substance was deployed in the building. new text end new text begin (b) The commissioner must provide the standard form to law enforcement agencies and local government units upon request and at no cost. new text end